Utah statutes.
31A-5-501.   Merger of subsidiary corporation.
The merger of subsidiary insurance corporations is subject to the provisions
of Chapter 16.  In addition, the merger procedures outlined under Title 16,
Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, apply to the mergers of
subsidiary insurance corporations.  For the purposes of this section, if the
surviving corporation owns at least 80% of the outstanding shares of each
class of the corporation to be merged into the surviving corporation, the
procedures of Section 16-10a-1104, including no requirement of shareholder
approval, may be used.
